Mississippi statutes. Title 31. Public Business, Bonds and Obligations
Bureau of Communications
[Repealed]

§§ 31-7-201 through 31-7-225.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1995, ch. 622, § 23, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

§31-7-201. [Laws, 1983, ch. 516, § 1; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 289]

§31-7-203. [Laws, 1983, ch. 516, § 2; Laws, 1984, ch. 374, § 1; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 290; Laws, 1985, ch. 525, § 21; Laws, 1994 Ex Sess, ch. 26, § 23]

§31-7-205. [Laws, 1983, ch. 516, § 3; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 291]

§31-7-207. [Laws, 1983, ch. 516, § 4; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 292; Laws, 1985, ch. 525, § 22]

§31-7-209. [Laws, 1983, ch. 516, § 5; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 293; Laws, 1985, ch. 525, § 23]

§31-7-211. [Laws, 1983, ch. 516, § 13; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 294; Laws, 1985, ch. 525, § 24]

§31-7-213. [Laws, 1983, ch. 516, § 6; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 295; Laws, 1985, ch. 525, § 25]

§31-7-215. [Laws, 1983, ch. 516, § 7; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 296; Laws, 1985, ch. 525, § 26]

§31-7-217. [Laws, 1983, ch. 516, § 8; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 297; Laws, 1985, ch. 525, § 27]

§31-7-219. [Laws, 1983, ch. 516, § 9; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 298; Laws, 1985, ch. 525, § 28]

§31-7-221. [Laws, 1983, ch. 516, § 10; Laws, 1984, ch. 374, § 2; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 299; Laws, 1985, ch. 525, § 29]

§31-7-223. [Laws, 1983, ch. 516, § 11; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 300; Laws, 1985, ch. 525, § 30; Laws, 1986, ch. 329]

§31-7-225. [Laws, 1983, ch. 516, § 12; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 301; Laws, 1985, ch. 525, § 31]